Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 376 of Title 59, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical


advertising” means any promotional communication targeting consumers


including, but not limited to, television, radio, print media,


digital platforms, and social media, that markets prescription


drugs.


B. No person or entity may engage in direct-to-consumer


pharmaceutical advertising within this state.


C. The State Board of Pharmacy may assess an administrative


penalty against a person or entity who violates this section or

Req. No. 2379 Page 1


fails to comply with a rule adopted under this section, not to


exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per day for each violation.


Each day a violation continues may be considered a separate


violation.


D. The Board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2379 DC 1/12/2026 5:28:13 PM































Req. No. 2379 Page 2